North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159. Local Government Finance.
Part 2. Procedure for Issuing Bonds.

§ 159-50.
Notice of intent to make application for issuance of voted bonds; objection by citizens and taxpayers.

When a unit of local government proposes to issue bonds that must be approved by a vote of the people, it shall first publish a notice of its intent to make application to the Commission for approval of the issue. The notice shall be published once not less than 10 days before the application is filed. The notice shall state (i) that the board intends to file an application with the Commission for approval of a bond issue, (ii) in brief and general terms the purpose of the proposed issue, (iii) the maximum amount of bonds to be issued, and (iv) that any citizen or taxpayer of the issuing unit may, within seven days after the date of the publication, file with the governing board and the Commission a statement of any objections he may have to the issue. The Commission may prescribe the form of the notice.

Any citizen or taxpayer of the issuing unit who objects to the proposed bond issue in whole or in part may, within seven days from the date of publication of the notice, file a written statement of his objections with the board and the Commission. The statement shall set forth each objection to the proposed bond issue and shall contain the name and address of the person filing it. The Commission shall consider the statement of objections along with the application and shall notify the objector and the board of its disposition of each objection.

Failure to comply with this section shall not affect the validity of any bonds otherwise issued in accordance with the law. This section shall not apply to bonds that need not be submitted to a vote of the people.

History.

1953, c. 1121; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For symposium on municipal finance, see 1976 Duke L.J. 1051 (1976).

§ 159-51.
Application to Commission for approval of bond issue; preliminary conference; acceptance of application.

No bonds may be issued under this Article unless the issue is approved by the Local Government Commission. The governing board of the issuing unit shall file an application for Commission approval of the issue with the secretary of the Commission. If the issuing unit is a regional public transportation authority, the application must be accompanied by resolutions of the special tax board of that authority and of each of the boards of county commissioners of the counties organizing the authority approving of the application. The application shall state such facts and have attached to it such documents concerning the proposed bonds and the financial condition of the issuing unit as the secretary may require. The Commission may prescribe the form of the application.

Before he accepts the application, the secretary may require the governing board or its representatives to attend a preliminary conference to consider the proposed bond issue. If the issuing unit is a merged school administrative unit described in

G.S. 115C-513

, each county in which the merged unit is located may attend the preliminary conference.

After an application in proper form has been filed, and after a preliminary conference if one is required, the secretary shall notify the unit in writing that the application has been filed and accepted for submission to the Commission. The secretary’s statement shall be conclusive evidence that the unit has complied with this section.

History.

1953, c. 1121; 1971, c. 780, s. 2; 1989, c. 740, s. 5; 1991, c. 325, s. 6; c. 666, s. 6.

§ 159-52.
Approval of application by Commission.

In determining whether a proposed bond issue shall be approved, the Commission may consider:

Whether the project to be financed from the proceeds of the bond issue is necessary or expedient.

The nature and amount of the outstanding debt of the issuing unit.

The unit’s debt management procedures and policies.

The unit’s tax and special assessments collection record.

The unit’s compliance with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

Whether the unit is in default in any of its debt service obligations.

The unit’s present tax rates, and the increase in tax rate, if any, necessary to service the proposed debt.

The unit’s appraised and assessed value of property subject to taxation.

The ability of the unit to sustain the additional taxes necessary to service the debt.

The ability of the Commission to market the proposed bonds at reasonable interest rates.

If the proposed issue is for a utility or public service enterprise, the probable net revenues of the project to be financed and the extent to which the revenues of the utility or enterprise, after addition of the revenues of the project to be financed, will be sufficient to service the proposed debt.

Whether the amount of the proposed debt will be adequate to accomplish the purpose for which it is to be incurred.

If the proposed bond issue is for a water system as described in G.S. 159-48(b)(21), whether a unit has prepared a local water supply plan in compliance with

G.S. 143-355

.

The Commission may inquire into and give consideration to any other matters which it may believe to have a bearing on whether the issue should be approved.

The Commission shall approve the application if, upon the information and evidence it receives, it finds and determines:

That the proposed bond issue is necessary or expedient.

That the amount proposed is adequate and not excessive for the proposed purpose of the issue.

That the unit’s debt management procedures and policies are good, or that reasonable assurances have been given that its debt will henceforth be managed in strict compliance with law.

That the increase in taxes, if any, necessary to service the proposed debt will not be excessive.

That the proposed bonds can be marketed at reasonable rates of interest.If the Commission tentatively decides to deny the application because it is of the opinion that any one or more of these conclusions cannot be supported from the information presented to it, it shall so notify the unit filing the application. If the unit so requests, the Commission shall hold a public hearing on the application at which time any interested persons shall be heard. The Commission may appoint a hearing officer to conduct the hearing, and to present a summary of the testimony and his recommendations for the Commission’s consideration.

History.

1931, c. 60, ss. 12, 13; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 2011-374, s. 3.3.

§ 159-53.
Order approving or disapproving an application.

After considering an application, and conducting a public hearing thereon if one is requested under

G.S. 159-52(b)

, the Commission shall enter its order either approving or denying the application. An order approving an issue shall not be regarded as an approval of the legality of the bonds in any respect.

If the Commission shall enter an order denying an application, the proceedings under this Subchapter shall be at an end.

History.

1931, c. 60, s. 14; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-54.
The bond order.

After or at the same time the application is filed with the Commission, a bond order shall be introduced before the governing board of the issuing unit. The bond order shall state:

Briefly and generally and without specification of location or material of construction, the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, but not more than one purpose may be stated. For funding or refunding bonds a brief description of the debt, judgment, or obligation to be funded or refunded shall be sufficient.

The maximum aggregate principal amount of the bonds.

That taxes will be levied in an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest of the bonds.

The extent, if any, to which utility or enterprise revenues are, or may be, pledged to payment of interest on and principal of the bonds pursuant to

G.S. 159-47

.

That a sworn statement of debt has been filed with the clerk and is open to public inspection.

If the bonds are to be approved by the voters, that the bond order will take effect when approved by the voters.

If the bonds are issued pursuant to G.S. 159-48(a)(1), (2), (3), or (5), that the bond order will take effect upon its adoption. If the bonds are to be issued pursuant to G.S. 159-48(a)(4), (6), or (7) or G.S. 159-48(b), (c), or (d) and are not to be submitted to the voters, that the bond order will take effect 30 days after its publication following adoption, unless it is petitioned to a vote of the people as provided in

G.S. 159-60

, and that in that event the order will take effect when approved by the voters.

When the bond order is introduced, the board shall fix the time and place for a public hearing thereon.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 17; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(17); c. 285, s. 2; C.S., s. 2938; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 9; 1931, c. 60, ss. 49, 55; 1933, c. 259, ss. 1, 2; 1935, c. 302, ss. 1, 2; 1949, c. 497, ss. 1, 3; 1957, c. 856, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 6; 2012-156, s. 2.

§ 159-55.
Sworn statement of debt; debt limitation; statement of estimated interest on the bonds.

After the bond order has been introduced and before the public hearing thereon, the finance officer (or some other officer designated by the governing board for this purpose) shall file with the clerk a statement showing the following:

The gross debt of the unit, excluding therefrom debt incurred or to be incurred in anticipation of the collection of taxes or other revenues or in anticipation of the sale of bonds other than funding and refunding bonds. The gross debt (after exclusions) is the sum of (i) outstanding debt evidenced by bonds, (ii) bonds authorized by orders introduced but not yet adopted, (iii) unissued bonds authorized by adopted orders, and (iv) outstanding debt not evidenced by bonds. However, for purposes of the sworn statement of debt and the debt limitation, revenue bonds and project development financing debt instruments (unless additionally secured by a pledge of the issuing unit’s faith and credit) shall not be considered debt and shall not be included in gross debt nor deducted from gross debt.

The deductions to be made from gross debt in computing net debt. The following deductions are allowed:

Funding and refunding bonds authorized by orders introduced but not yet adopted.

Funding and refunding bonds authorized but not yet issued.

The amount of money held in sinking funds or otherwise for the payment of any part of the principal of gross debt other than debt incurred for water, gas, electric light or power purposes, or sanitary sewer purposes (to the extent that the bonds are deductible under subsection (b) of this section), or two or more of these purposes.

The amount of bonded debt included in gross debt and incurred, or to be incurred, for water, gas, or electric light or power purposes, or any two or more of these purposes.

The amount of bonded debt included in the gross debt and incurred, or to be incurred, for sanitary sewer system purposes to the extent that the debt is made deductible by subsection (b) of this section.

The amount of uncollected special assessments theretofore levied for local improvements for which any part of the gross debt (that is not otherwise deducted) was or is to be incurred, to the extent that the assessments will be applied, when collected, to the payment of any part of the gross debt.

The amount, as estimated by the governing board of the issuing unit or an officer designated by the board for this purpose, of special assessments to be levied for local improvements for which any part of the gross debt (that is not otherwise deducted) was or is to be incurred, to the extent that the special assessments, when collected, will be applied to the payment of any part of the gross debt.

The net debt of the issuing unit, being the difference between the gross debt and deductions.

The assessed value of property subject to taxation by the issuing unit, as revealed by the tax records and certified to the issuing unit by the assessor. In calculating the assessed value, the incremental valuation of any development financing district located in the unit, as determined pursuant to

G.S. 159-107

, shall not be included.

The percentage that the net debt bears to the assessed value of property subject to taxation by the issuing unit.

Debt incurred or to be incurred for sanitary sewer system purposes is deductible from gross debt when the combined revenues of the water system and the sanitary sewer system (whether or not the water and sewer system are operated separately or as a consolidated system) were sufficient to pay all operating, capital outlay, and debt service expenditures attributable to both systems in each of the three complete fiscal years immediately preceding the date on which the sworn statement of debt is filed. For the purposes of this subsection, the “revenues” of a water system and a sanitary sewer system include:

Rates, fees, rentals, charges, and other receipts and income derived from or in connection with the system.

Fees, rents, or other charges collected from other offices, agencies, institutions, and departments of the issuing unit at rates not in excess of those charged to other consumers, customers, or users.

Appropriations from the fund balance of the prior fiscal year from the fund or funds established to account for the revenues and expenditures of the water system or sewer system pursuant to G.S. 159-13(a) of the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act.

Before the sworn statement of debt is filed, the secretary shall determine to what extent debt incurred or to be incurred for sanitary sewer system purposes qualifies for deduction from gross debt pursuant to this subsection, and shall give his certificate to that effect. The secretary’s certificate shall be filed with and deemed a part of the sworn statement of debt. The secretary’s certificate shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud.

No bond order shall be adopted unless it appears from the sworn statement of debt filed in connection therewith that the net debt of the unit does not exceed eight percent (8%) of the assessed value of property subject to taxation by the issuing unit. This limitation shall not apply to:

Funding and refunding bonds.

Bonds issued for water, gas, or electric power purposes, or two or more of these purposes.

Bonds issued for sanitary sewer system purposes when the bonds are deductible pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Bonds issued for sanitary sewers, sewage disposal, or sewage purification plants when the construction of these facilities has been ordered by the Environmental Management Commission, which Commission is hereby authorized to make such an order, or by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Bonds or notes issued for erosion control purposes.

Bonds or notes issued for the purpose of erecting jetties or other protective works to prevent encroachment by the ocean, sounds, or other bodies of water.

At the time the bond order is introduced, the finance officer (or some other officer designated by the governing board for this purpose) shall file with the clerk a statement of the finance officer estimating the total amount of interest that will be paid on the bonds over the expected term of the bonds, if issued, and a summary of the assumptions upon which the estimate is based. The statement shall include a statement to the effect that the amount estimated is preliminary and is for general informational purposes only, that there is no assurance that the assumptions upon which the estimate is based will occur, that the occurrence of certain of the assumptions is beyond the control of the unit, and that differences between the actual circumstances at the time the bonds are issued from the assumptions included in the estimate could result in significant differences between the estimated interest and the actual interest on the bonds. The statement may include other qualifications as the finance officer deems appropriate. The validity of the bonds authorized by the order is not subject to challenge on the grounds that the actual interest cost of the bonds when issued is different than the amount set forth in the statement. The statement shall be filed with the Local Government Commission and maintained by the Clerk.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 19; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(19); c. 285, s. 4; C.S., s. 2943; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, ss. 13, 14; c. 102, s. 1; 1931, c. 60, s. 51; 1933, c. 259, s. 1; c. 321; Ex. Sess. 1938, c. 3; 1955, c. 1045; 1959, c. 779, s. 10; 1967, c. 892, s. 4; 1969, c. 1092; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 7; c. 1262, s. 231; 1991, c. 11, ss. 2, 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1007, s. 41; 2003-403, s. 4; 2013-200, s. 1.

§ 159-56.
Publication of bond order as introduced.

After the introduction of the bond order, the clerk shall publish it once with the following statement appended: “The foregoing order has been introduced and a sworn statement of debt has been filed under the Local Government Bond Act showing the appraised value of the [issuing unit] to be $ and the net debt thereof, including the proposed bonds, to be $ . The finance officer of the [issuing unit] has filed a statement estimating that the total amount of interest that will be paid on the bonds over the expected term of the bonds, if issued, is $ . The estimate is preliminary, is for general informational purposes only, and may differ from the actual interest paid on the bonds. A tax will [may] be levied to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds if they are issued. Anyone who wishes to be heard on the questions of the validity of the bond order and the advisability of issuing the bonds may appear at a public hearing or an adjournment thereof to be held at . Clerk” The publication may include a summary of the assumptions upon which the estimate of the total amount of interest that will be paid on the bonds over the expected term of the bonds, if issued, is based, and may further state that there is no assurance that the circumstances included in the assumptions will occur, that the occurrence of certain of the assumptions is beyond the control of the issuing unit, and that differences between the actual circumstances at the time the bonds are issued from the assumptions included in the estimate could result in significant differences between the estimated interest and the actual interest on the bonds. The statement may include additional qualifications as the unit deems appropriate. The validity of bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to this act is not subject to challenge on the grounds that the actual interest cost of the bonds when issued is different than the amount set forth in the estimate referenced in the publication of the bond order as introduced.

Click to view

History.

1927, c. 81, s. 16; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 2013-200, s. 2.

§ 159-56.1.
Certain proceedings ratified notwithstanding provisions of § 159-56.

All proceedings heretofore taken by the governing boards of units of local government in connection with the authorization of bonds are hereby ratified, approved, confirmed and in all respects validated, notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 159-56

; provided that the issuance of said bonds, the indebtedness to be incurred by the issuance thereof and the levy of a tax for the payment thereof shall have been approved at an election by a majority of the qualified voters of the unit voting thereon.

History.

1973, c. 1172.

§ 159-57.
Hearing; passage of bond order.

On the date fixed for the public hearing, which shall be not earlier than six days after the date of publication of the bond order as introduced, the board shall hear anyone who may wish to be heard on the question of the validity of the order or the advisability of issuing the bonds. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time.

After the hearing, (and on the same day as the hearing, if the board so desires) the board may pass the order as introduced, or as amended. No amendment may increase the amount of bonds to be issued, nor substantially change the purpose of the issue. If the board wishes to increase the amount of bonds to be issued, or to substantially change the purpose of the issue, a new proceeding under this Article is required.

The provisions of any city charter, general law, or local act to the contrary notwithstanding, a bond order may be introduced at any regular or special meeting of the governing board and adopted at any such meeting by a simple majority of those present and voting, a quorum being present, and need not be published or subjected to any procedural requirements governing the adoption of ordinances or resolutions by the governing board other than the procedures set out in this Subchapter. Bond orders shall not be subject to the provisions of any city charter or local act concerning initiative and referendum.

History.

1927, c. 81, s. 17; 1953, c. 1065, s. 1; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-58.
Publication of bond order as adopted.

After adoption, the clerk shall publish the bond order once, with the following statement appended: “The foregoing order was adopted on the day of , , and is hereby published this day of , . Any action or proceeding questioning the validity of the order must be begun within 30 days after the date of publication of this notice. The finance officer of the [issuing unit] has filed a statement estimating that the total amount of interest that will be paid on the bonds over the expected term of the bonds, if issued, is $ . The estimate is preliminary, is for general informational purposes only, and may differ from the actual interest paid on the bonds. Clerk” The publication may include a summary of the assumptions upon which the estimate of the total amount of interest that will be paid on the bonds over the expected term of the bonds, if issued, is based, and may further state that there is no assurance that the circumstances included in the assumptions will occur, that the occurrence of certain of the assumptions is beyond the control of the issuing unit, and that differences between the actual circumstances at the time the bonds are issued from the assumptions included in the estimate could result in significant differences between the estimated interest and the actual interest on the bonds. The statement may include such additional qualifications as the unit deems appropriate. The validity of bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to this act is not subject to challenge on the grounds that the actual interest cost of the bonds when issued is different than the amount set forth in the estimate referenced in the publication of the bond order as adopted.

Click to view

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 20; 1919, c. 49, s. 1; c. 178, s. 3(20); C.S., s. 2944; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 19; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 59; 2013-200, s. 3.

§ 159-59.
Limitation of action to set aside order.

Any action or proceeding in any court to set aside a bond order, or to obtain any other relief, upon the ground that the order is invalid, must be begun within 30 days after the date of publication of the bond order as adopted. After the expiration of this period of limitation, no right of action or defense based upon the invalidity of the order shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the order be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceeding begun within the period of limitation prescribed in this section.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 20; 1919, c. 49, s. 1; c. 178, s. 3(20); C.S., s. 2945; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 20; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-60.
Petition for referendum on bond issue.

A petition demanding that a bond order be submitted to the voters may be filed with the clerk within 30 days after the date of publication of the bond order as introduced. The petition shall be in writing, and shall be signed by a number of voters of the issuing unit equal to not less than ten percent (10%) of the total number of voters registered to vote in elections of the issuing unit according to the most recent figures certified by the Board of Elections. The residence address of each signer shall be written after his signature. The petition need not contain the text of the order to which it refers, and need not be all on one sheet.

The clerk shall investigate the sufficiency of the petition and present it to the governing board, with a certificate stating the results of his investigation. The governing board, after hearing any taxpayer who may request to be heard, shall thereupon determine the sufficiency of the petition, and its determination shall be conclusive.

This section does not apply to bonds issued pursuant to G.S. 159-48(a)(1), (2), (3), or (5).

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 21; 1919, c. 49, ss. 1, 2; c. 178, s. 3(21); C.S., s. 2947; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 20; c. 102, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 8; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” in the first paragraph.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the reference.

§ 159-61.
Bond referenda; majority required; notice of referendum; form of ballot; canvass.

If a bond order is to take effect upon approval of the voters, the affirmative vote or a majority of those who vote thereon shall be required. (b) The date of a bond referendum shall be fixed by the governing board, but shall not be more than one year after adoption of the bond order, only on a date permitted by . The clerk shall mail or deliver a certified copy of the resolution calling a special bond referendum to the board of elections that is to conduct it within three days after the resolution is adopted, but failure to observe this requirement shall not in any manner affect the validity of the referendum or bonds issued pursuant thereto. Bond referenda shall be conducted by the board of elections conducting regular elections of the county, city, or special district. Several bond orders or other matters may be voted upon at the same referendum. G.S. 163-287 (c) The clerk shall publish a notice of the referendum at least twice. The first publication shall be not less than 14 days and the second publication not less than seven days before the last day on which voters may register for the referendum. The notice shall state the date of the referendum, the maximum amount of the proposed bonds, the purpose of the bonds, a statement that taxes will or may be levied for the payment thereof, and a statement as to the last day for registration for the referendum under the election laws then in effect. (d) The form of the question as stated on the ballot shall be in substantially the following words: “Shall the order authorizing $ bonds plus interest for (briefly stating the purpose) and providing that additional taxes may be levied in an amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds be approved? [ ] YES [ ] NO” (e) The board of elections shall canvass the referendum and certify the results to the governing board. The governing board shall then certify and declare the result of the referendum and shall publish a statement of the result once, with the following statement appended: ‘‘Any action or proceeding challenging the regularity or validity of this bond referendum must be begun within 30 days after (date of publication) (title of governing board)’’ The statement of results shall be filed in the clerk’s office and inserted in the minutes of the board.

Click to view

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 22; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(22); c. 291; C.S., s. 2948; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, ss. 22, 23, 25-27, 29; 1949, c. 497, ss. 2, 4; 1953, c. 1065, ss. 1, 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1973, c. 494, s. 9; 2013-200, s. 4; 2013-381, s. 10.26; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Techical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “G.S. 163A-1592” for “G.S. 163-287” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the reference in subsection (b).

§ 159-62.
Limitation on actions contesting validity of bond referenda.

Any action or proceeding in any court to set aside a bond referendum, or to obtain any other relief, upon the ground that the referendum is invalid or was irregularly conducted, must be begun within 30 days after the publication of the statement of the results of the referendum. After the expiration of this period of limitation, no right of action or defense based upon the invalidity of or any irregularity in the referendum shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the referendum be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceeding begun within the period of limitation prescribed in this section.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 22; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(22); c. 291; C.S., s. 2948; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81, s. 30; 1949, c. 497, s. 4; 1953, c. 1065, s. 2; 1971, c. 780, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to limitation of action to set aside bonds, see

G.S. 159-59

.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 law on civil procedure, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1053 (1981).

§ 159-63.
Repeal of bond orders.

A bond order may be repealed at any time before bonds or bond anticipation notes are issued thereunder. No referendum is required on the repeal of any bond order, nor is a petition for any such referendum permitted.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 159-64.
Within what time bonds may be issued.

Bonds may be issued under a bond order at any time within seven years after the bond order takes effect. Such period may be extended prior to the expiration of such period from seven years to 10 years as hereinafter provided. The board of the issuing unit shall file an application for Commission approval of such extension with the secretary of the Commission. The application shall state such facts and have attached to it such documents concerning such extension as the secretary may require. The Commission may prescribe the form of such application. In determining whether to approve such extension, the Commission may inquire into and give consideration to any matters which it believes may relate to such extension.

The Commission may enter an order approving a proposed extension of the maximum time period for issuing bonds under a bond order from seven to 10 years if, upon the basis of the information and evidence it receives, it finds and determines that governmental approvals relative to the purpose to be financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds cannot be obtained within seven years after the bond order has taken effect, that funds to be applied together with the proceeds of the bonds to finance the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued will not be available within seven years after the bond order has taken effect or that the proposed extension is necessary for other reasons that are not within the direct control of the issuing unit other than any order of any court. If the Commission enters an order denying such extension, then the proceedings under this section shall be at an end.

If the Commission enters an order approving a proposed extension of the maximum time period for issuing bonds under a bond order as provided in this section, then the board shall fix the time and place for a public hearing on such extension and the clerk shall publish such bond order once with the following statement appended:

“The foregoing order took effect on , . Anyone who wishes to be heard on the question of whether the maximum time period for issuing bonds under such order should be extended from seven years to 10 years after such date may appear at a public hearing or an adjournment thereof to be held at (time) on at (date) (place) Clerk’’ On the date fixed for such hearing, which shall be not earlier than six days after the date of publication of the bond order with appended statement as provided in this section, the board shall hear anyone who might wish to be heard on the question of whether the maximum time period for issuing bonds under the bond order should be extended from seven years to 10 years. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time. After such hearing, the board may adopt an order providing that the maximum time period for issuing bonds under the bond order has been extended from seven to 10 years after the bond order has taken effect. Such order shall provide that it will take effect 30 days after its publication following adoption. After adoption, the clerk shall publish once an order extending the maximum time period for issuing bonds under a bond order with the following statement appended: “The foregoing order was adopted on the day of , , and is hereby published this day of , . Any action or proceeding questioning the validity of such order must be begun within 30 days after the date of publication of this notice. Clerk’’

Click to view

Any action or proceeding in any court to set aside an order extending the maximum time period for issuing bonds under a bond order, or to obtain any other relief, upon the ground that such order is invalid, must be begun within 30 days after the date of publication of such order as adopted. After the expiration of this period of limitation, no right of action or defense based upon the invalidity of such order shall be asserted nor shall the validity of such order be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceeding begun within the period of limitation prescribed in this section.

When the issuance of bonds under any bond order is prevented or prohibited by any order of any court, the period of time within which bonds may be issued under the bond order in litigation shall be extended by the length of time elapsing between the date of institution of the action or proceeding and the date of its final disposition.

When the issuance of bonds under any bond order, to finance public improvements in an area to be annexed, is prevented or prohibited by reason of litigation respecting the annexation and the Local Government Commission shall certify to such effect, the period of time within which bonds may be issued under the bond order shall be extended by the length of time elapsing between the date of institution of the litigation and the date of its final disposition.

The General Assembly may at any time prior to the expiration of the maximum time period herein provided extend the time for issuing bonds under bond orders.

When any such extension is effected or granted pursuant to this section, no further approval of the voters shall be required.

History.

1917, c. 138, s. 24; 1919, c. 178, s. 3(24); C.S., s. 2950; 1921, c. 8, s. 1; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 106, s. 1; 1927, c. 81; s. 32; 1939, c. 231, ss. 1, 2(d); 1947, c. 510, ss. 1, 2; 1949, c. 190, ss. 1, 2; 1951, c. 439, ss. 1, 2; 1953, c. 693, ss. 1, 3; 1955, c. 704, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 99; 1971, c. 780, s. 1; 1975, c. 545, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 36; 1979, c. 444, s. 1.